Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 36

Arkansas Economic Opportunity Expansion Act

25-36-101. Findings — Purpose.

The General Assembly finds:

To the extent minority-owned businesses are given fair opportunities to compete, all Arkansans benefit;

During 2002, the State of Arkansas spent nine hundred million four hundred thousand dollars ($900,400,000) procuring goods and services;

Although the state possesses more than seven thousand (7,000) minority-owned businesses, less than three-tenths of one percent (0.03%) of state expenditures on goods and services was spent with minority-owned businesses in 2002;

Small and minority-owned businesses employ forty-eight and nine-tenths percent (48.9%) of the state's total employment;

Seventy-two percent (72%) of all current jobs in the Delta Region of Arkansas, Louisiana, and Mississippi are provided through small and minority-owned businesses;

An increase of four thousand (4,000) jobs in small, minority-owned, and medium-sized businesses would radiate through the state to result in the creation of forty-eight thousand (48,000) new jobs;

Expanding the profitability and spending power of these businesses will allow them to provide employment opportunities and to increase economic growth and development within Arkansas communities;

Expansion of economic opportunity will reduce unemployment and the need for state-supported social welfare programs, while increasing the state tax base and the appeal to minority-owned businesses from other businesses within their industry for raw materials and production support; and

Increased economic output and employment by minority-owned businesses will have a positive rippling impact throughout the state.

This chapter is intended to expand economic opportunities for Arkansas' minority communities but is not intended to establish any quota system or program.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1814, § 1.

25-36-102. Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

“Minority” means the same as in § 1-2-503; and

“State agency” means any office, department, board, commission, bureau, division, public corporation, agency, institution of higher learning, or instrumentality of this state.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1814, § 1.

25-36-103. Agency contracting — Diversity.

A state agency shall include in all requests for proposals and requests for qualifications, language that encourages minority participation in each request for proposals and request for qualifications issued by the state agency.

State agency requests for proposals and requests for qualifications shall take into consideration minority inclusion in the proposed project.

Requests for proposals and requests for qualifications shall provide that an applicant unable to include minority-owned businesses may explain the circumstances preventing minority inclusion.

The dollar amount for each contract awarded to a minority-owned business;

The total dollar amount spent on contracts by each state agency; and

The number and percentage of minority-owned businesses awarded contracts by the agency.

The director shall report the data required under subsection (a) of this section semiannually to the Governor and to the cochairs of the Legislative Council and to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and the Minority and Women-owned Business Advisory Council.

Each state agency shall include in its budget report to the Joint Budget Committee a listing of all contracts in amounts exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) awarded to minority-owned businesses.

The vice president or vice chancellor for finance of each state college and university shall include in his or her budget report to the Joint Budget Committee a listing of all contracts in amounts exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) awarded to minority-owned businesses.

The director shall promulgate rules necessary for the implementation of this chapter.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000)” for “twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000)” in (a)(1), (c)(1) and (c)(2).

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (d).

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1814, § 1.

25-36-104. Data recording and tracking.

(1)The State Procurement Director shall track data regarding minority participation in state contracts that exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

The data shall include, but not be limited to, information regarding:

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1814, § 1; 2005, No. 1962, § 113; 2013, No. 1189, § 6; 2019, No. 315, § 2934.